New York, session 2025-2026, S2502.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 612 of the tax law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph 48 to read as follows: 3 (48) an amount equal to the interest paid by the taxpayer during the 4 taxable year on any qualified education loan to the extent and as 5 provided in 26 USC § 221. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 7 years beginning on and after January 1, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05603-01-5